Ohio, session 136, SB430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3770.23, 3770.25, 3775.01, 3775.02, 3775.10, and 3775.99 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3770.23. As used in sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code: (A) "Sports Authorized sports gaming," "type C sports gaming proprietor," and "type C sports gaming host" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Lottery sports gaming" means authorized sports gaming conducted by a type C sports gaming proprietor on behalf of the state lottery commission and offered through lottery sales agents that are licensed as type C sports gaming hosts. Sec. 3770.25. (A) The state lottery commission shall offer lottery sports gaming only at type C sports gaming hosts' facilities on self-service or clerk-operated terminals, and only to individuals who are at least twenty-one years of age and who are physically present on the premises of the facility. (B) All of the following apply concerning lottery sports gaming: (1) If a type C sports gaming proprietor intends to install more than two terminals in any type C sports gaming host's facility, the type C sports gaming proprietor shall notify the Ohio casino control commission of that fact not later than seven days before installing the additional terminals. The commission may disallow the installation of more than two terminals in the facility, in accordance with the commission's rules. (2) The self-service terminal or the clerk, as applicable, shall verify that the lottery sports gaming participant is at least twenty-one years of age. (3) A type C sports gaming proprietor may offer only the following types of wagers on authorized sporting events, as approved by the Ohio casino control commission: (a) Spread wagers; (b) Over-under wagers; (c) Moneyline wagers; (d) Parlay wagers that are based on not more than four component wagers. (4) A self-service terminal or clerk shall accept wagers only by cash, credit card, debit card, or electronic payment account. As used in this section, "electronic payment account" means an account maintained with a third party for purposes of making electronic payments, such as paypal, google pay, or apple pay, that is intended for general use and not only for sports gaming purposes. (5) A self-service terminal or clerk shall not accept wagers aggregating more than seven hundred dollars in a calendar week from any one participant. (6) The rules of the Ohio casino control commission and the state lottery commission concerning lottery sports gaming shall apply identically in all applicable respects to lottery sports gaming offered on a self-service terminal and to lottery sports gaming offered on a clerk-operated terminal. (C)(1) A participant whose winnings from lottery sports gaming are of an amount that does not meet or exceed the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041 may receive the participant's winnings by any of the following methods: (a) As a credit to the participant's credit card, debit card, or electronic payment account; (b) In cash from any type C sports gaming host; (c) By any additional method permitted by the state lottery commission by rule. (2) A participant whose winnings from lottery sports gaming are of an amount that meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041 may receive the participant's winnings in the manner determined by the state lottery commission, subject to withholding by the sports gaming proprietor under sections 718.031, 3123.90, 3775.16, and 5747.063 of the Revised Code or subject to withholding by the state lottery commission under sections 718.031, 3770.071, 3770.073, and 5747.062 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Sec. 3775.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Applicant" means a person that applies to the Ohio casino control commission for a license under this chapter. (B) "Authorized sporting event" means a sporting event that is a professional sport or athletic event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, an Olympic or international sports competition event, a motor race event, an esports event, or another special event the Ohio casino control commission authorizes for sports gaming. (1) "Authorized sporting event" does not include an event for primary or secondary school students, whether conducted or sponsored by a primary or secondary school or by another person. (2) "Authorized sporting event" includes an event that involves athletes or participants who are under eighteen years of age, or the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in the event, only if the Ohio casino control commission authorizes the event for sports gaming. (C) Except as otherwise provided in section 3770.25 of the Revised Code, "authorized sports gaming" means sports gaming conducted using a system or method of wagering on authorized sporting events that the Ohio casino control commission approves, including exchange wagering, parlays, spreads, over-under, moneyline, in-game wagering, single game bets, teaser bets, in-play bets, proposition bets, pools, pari-mutuel sports wagering pools, or straight bets. (D) "Casino operator" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (C) (E) "Collegiate sport or athletic event" means a sport or athletic event offered or sponsored by, or played in connection with, a public or private institution that offers educational services beyond the secondary level. (D) (F) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. (E) (G) "Esports event" means an organized video game competition that is regulated by a sports governing body and that is held between professional players who play individually or as teams. (F) (H) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) (I)(1) "Mobile management services provider" means a person that contracts with a type A sports gaming proprietor under section 3775.05 of the Revised Code to operate sports gaming on behalf of the sports gaming proprietor and that is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission as a mobile management services provider under that section. (2) "Management services provider" means a person that contracts with a type B sports gaming proprietor under section 3775.051 of the Revised Code to operate sports gaming on behalf of the sports gaming proprietor and that is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission as a management services provider under that section. (H) (J) "Official league data" means statistics, results, outcomes, and other data related to a sporting event provided by the appropriate sports governing body or its designee. (I) (K) "Online sports pool" means sports gaming in which a wager on a sporting event is made through a computer or mobile device and accepted through an online gaming web site that is operated by a type A sports gaming proprietor or mobile management services provider. (J) (L) "Professional sport or athletic event" means an event at which two or more persons participate in sports or athletic events and receive compensation, or the potential for compensation based on their performance, in excess of actual expenses for their participation in the event. (K) (M) "Professional sports organization" means any of the following: (1) The owner of a professional sports team in this state that is a member of the national football league, the national hockey league, major league baseball, major league soccer, or the national basketball association; (2) The owner of a sports facility in this state that hosts an annual tournament on the professional golf association tour or a wholly owned for-profit subsidiary of the owner, if the owner is a nonprofit corporation or organization; (3) A promoter of a national association for stock car auto racing national touring race conducted in this state. (L) (N) "Promotional gaming credit" means a credit, discount, or other similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement of, or increase in, a wager on a sporting event. (M) (O) "Proposition bet" means a wager on a sporting event that is based on whether an identified instance or statistical achievement will occur, will be achieved, or will be surpassed, other than the score or outcome of the sporting event or parts of the sporting event, such as quarters, halves, periods, or innings. (N)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (N)(2) and (3) of this section, "sporting (P) "Sporting event" means any professional sport or athletic event, any collegiate sport or athletic event, any Olympic or international sports competition event, any motor race event, any esports event, or any other special event the Ohio casino control commission authorizes for sports gaming a match, game, race, athletic contest, or other organized competitive activity, the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in such an event, or a combination of those. (2) "Sporting event" does not include an event for primary or secondary school students, whether conducted or sponsored by a primary or secondary school or by another person, or the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in such an event. (3) "Sporting event" includes an event that involves athletes or participants who are under eighteen years of age, or the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in the event, only if the Ohio casino control commission authorizes the event for sports gaming. (O)(1) "Sports (Q)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (Q)(3) of this section, "sports gaming" means the business of accepting wagers on sporting events. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (O)(3) of this section and in section 3770.25 of the Revised Code, "sports gaming" includes any system or method of wagering on sporting events that the Ohio casino control commission approves, including exchange wagering, parlays, spreads, over-under, moneyline, in-game wagering, single game bets, teaser bets, in-play bets, proposition bets, pools, pari-mutuel sports wagering pools, or straight bets. "Sports gaming" includes the use of a prediction market to acquire, sell, or trade an event contract that is contingent on the outcome of a sporting event. As used in this division: (a) "Event contract" means an instrument that provides for payment based on the occurrence of an event or contingency. (b) "Prediction market" means a system that allows a person to acquire, sell, or trade event contracts. (3) "Sports gaming" does not include any of the following: (a) Wagering on horse racing as authorized under Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code; (b) Lottery games authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, including video lottery terminals, other than lottery sports gaming authorized under sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code; (c) Casino gaming authorized under division (C) of Section 6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code; (d) Fantasy contests authorized under Chapter 3774. of the Revised Code. (P) (R) "Sports gaming equipment" means any of the following that directly relate to or affect, or are used or consumed in, the operation of sports gaming: (1) Any mechanical, electronic, or other device, mechanism, or equipment, including a self-service sports gaming terminal; (2) Any software, application, components, or other goods; (3) Anything to be installed or used on a patron's personal device. (Q) (S) "Sports gaming facility" means a designated area of a building or structure in which patrons may place wagers on sporting events with a type B sports gaming proprietor either in person or using self-service sports gaming terminals. (R) (T) "Sports gaming license" means a sports gaming proprietor license, a mobile management services provider license, a management services provider license, a sports gaming occupational license, a type C sports gaming host license, or a sports gaming supplier license issued by the Ohio casino control commission under this chapter. (S) (U) "Sports gaming licensee" means a person who holds a valid sports gaming license. (T) (V) "Sports gaming proprietor" means a person licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming in this state as a type A, type B, or type C sports gaming proprietor. (U) (W) "Sports gaming receipts" has the same meaning as in section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. (V)(1) (X)(1) "Sports gaming supplier" means a person or entity that provides sports gaming equipment or related services to a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider, including providing services, directly or indirectly, that are necessary to create a betting market or to determine bet outcomes. (2) A sports gaming supplier that provides sports gaming equipment or services to be used through a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider is not considered a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider solely on that basis. (3) A sports governing body that provides official league data concerning its own sporting event to a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, management services provider, or sports gaming supplier is not considered a sports gaming supplier solely on that basis. (W) (Y) "Sports gaming voluntary exclusion program" means the program described in division (B)(11) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code. (X) (Z) "Sports governing body" means a regional, national, or international organization having ultimate authority over the rules and codes of conduct with respect to a sporting event and the participants in the sporting event. (Y) (AA) "Type A sports gaming proprietor" means a sports gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming through an online sports pool. (Z) (BB) "Type B sports gaming proprietor" means a sports gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming at a sports gaming facility. (AA) (CC) "Type C sports gaming proprietor" means a sports gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming through self-service or clerk-operated sports gaming terminals located at type C sports gaming hosts' facilities. (BB) (DD) "Type C sports gaming host" means the owner of a facility with an A-1-A, A-1c, D-1, D-2, or D-5 liquor permit issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code who is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming at the facility through a type C sports gaming proprietor. (CC) (EE) "Video lottery sales agent" means an agent of the state lottery authorized to operate video lottery terminals under section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (DD) (FF) "Wager" or "bet" means to risk a sum of money or thing of value on an uncertain occurrence. Sec. 3775.02. (A) The Ohio casino control commission shall have jurisdiction over all persons conducting or participating in the conduct of sports gaming authorized by as described in this chapter or by and in sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code, including the authority to license, regulate, investigate, and penalize those persons in a manner that is consistent with the commission's authority with respect to casino gaming. In all cases in which this chapter requires or allows the commission to adopt rules concerning sports gaming, the commission shall adopt those rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) The commission shall adopt rules that include all of the following: (1) Procedures for a sports gaming proprietor to accept wagers on a sporting event or series of sporting events; (2) The types of wagering tickets sports gaming proprietors are to use; (3) The manner in which sports gaming proprietors are to issue tickets; (4) The type of records sports gaming licensees are to keep; (5) The system to be used to place a wager with a sports gaming proprietor; (6) The manner in which sports gaming proprietors must verify that their patrons are at least twenty-one years of age; (7) Protections for a player placing a wager with a sports gaming proprietor; (8) Measures to promote responsible sports gaming; (9) Penalties and fines for violating this section or rules adopted under this section; (10) Restrictions to ensure that sports gaming proprietors' advertisements for sports gaming meet all of the following requirements: (a) They clearly convey the conditions under which sports gaming is being offered, including information about the cost to participate and the nature of any promotions and information to assist patrons in understanding the odds of winning; (b) They disclose the identity of the sports gaming proprietor and, if applicable, the mobile management services provider or management services provider; (c) They do not target individuals under twenty-one years of age, other individuals who are ineligible to participate in sports gaming, problem gamblers, or other vulnerable individuals; (d) They include messages designed to prevent problem gambling and provide information about how to access resources related to problem gambling; (e) They are not false, misleading, or deceptive to a reasonable consumer. (11) A sports gaming voluntary exclusion program, which shall allow a person to voluntarily exclude the person's self from participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter by placing the person's name on a voluntary exclusion list and following procedures set forth by the commission. (a) All of the following apply to the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program: (i) Except as provided by the commission by rule, a person who participates in the program shall agree to refrain from participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. (ii) The name of a person participating in the program shall be included on a list of persons excluded from participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. (iii) Except as provided by the commission by rule, no person who participates in the program shall petition the commission for admittance into a sports gaming facility or for permission to participate in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. (iv) The list of persons participating in the program and the personal information of those persons shall be confidential and shall only be disseminated by the commission to the state lottery commission, to a sports gaming proprietor and its agents and employees for purposes of enforcement, and to other entities, upon request of the participant and agreement by the commission. (v) A sports gaming proprietor shall make all reasonable attempts as determined by the commission to cease all direct marketing efforts to a person participating in the program. (vi) A sports gaming proprietor shall not cash the check of a person participating in the program or extend credit to the person in any manner. However, the program shall not exclude a sports gaming proprietor from seeking the payment of a debt accrued by a person before participating in the program. (vii) Any and all locations at which a person may register as a participant in the program shall be published. (b) The commission shall determine, by rule, whether a participant in the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program also automatically becomes a participant in the voluntary exclusion program established under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. The state lottery commission shall determine, by rule, whether a participant in the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program also automatically becomes a participant in any voluntary exclusion program established under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code. (12) A procedure by which a sports governing body may request anonymized sports gaming data from a sports gaming proprietor if the sports governing body believes that the integrity of one of its sporting events is in question. (13) A procedure by which a state university may request anonymized sports gaming data from a sports gaming proprietor for the purpose of conducting research to assist the commission in ensuring the integrity of sports gaming or to improve state-funded services related to responsible gambling and problem gambling. The data are not a public record, and the state university shall not disclose the data to any person, except for the purpose of conducting the research described in this division, as part of a peer-reviewed research report, or pursuant to an agreement between the state university and the sports gaming proprietor. As used in this division, "state university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (14) Any other procedure or thing the commission determines necessary to ensure the integrity of sports gaming regulated by the commission. (C)(1) The commission may, independently or at the request of any person, including a sports governing body, adopt rules to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of wager. (2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing a process by which the commission may prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of wager on a temporary emergency basis instead of by rule. (3)(a) A sports governing body may formally request the commission to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of wager. The sports governing body shall submit the formal request in the form and manner prescribed by the commission. Upon receiving the request, the commission promptly shall send written notice of the request to every sports gaming proprietor and shall consider any timely response submitted by a sports gaming proprietor. (b) If the commission determines that the sports governing body has shown good cause through its formal request to grant the requested prohibition or restriction, the commission promptly shall adopt the prohibition or restriction. (c) If the commission determines that the sports governing body has not shown good cause through its formal request to grant the requested prohibition or restriction, the commission promptly shall provide the sports governing body with notice and an opportunity for a hearing to offer further evidence in support of granting the requested prohibition or restriction. (D) The commission shall adopt rules establishing minimum internal control standards for the administration of sports gaming proprietors' operations, sports gaming equipment, systems, or other items used by sports gaming proprietors to conduct sports gaming, and the maintenance of sports gaming proprietors' financial records and other required records. The commission may approve minimum internal control standards proposed by sports gaming proprietors. (E)(1) The commission shall approve all sports gaming equipment and each form, variation, or composite of sports gaming to be used by sports gaming proprietors. (2)(a) Before approving a piece of sports gaming equipment or a form, variation, or composite of sports gaming, the commission shall require it to undergo scientific testing or technical evaluation, as the commission determines appropriate. The commission may require the testing or evaluation to be conducted at the expense of the sports gaming supplier or sports gaming proprietor, as applicable, by an independent testing laboratory certified by the commission. (b) The commission may certify an independent testing laboratory to test and evaluate sports gaming equipment and forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming if both of the following apply: (i) The laboratory is competent and qualified to scientifically test and technically evaluate sports gaming equipment and forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming for compliance with this chapter and with the rules of the commission and otherwise to perform the functions assigned to the laboratory by the commission; (ii) The laboratory is not owned or controlled by, is not affiliated with, and does not have any interest in a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, management services provider, sports gaming supplier, or sports governing body. (c) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the certification standards, fees, and duties that apply to a certified independent testing laboratory under division (E) of this section. (3) The commission shall adopt rules requiring sports gaming licensees and sports gaming facilities to use only approved sports gaming equipment acquired from a licensed sports gaming supplier and to use only approved forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming. (F)(1) The commission shall determine a person's eligibility to hold or renew a sports gaming license under this chapter, shall issue all sports gaming licenses, and shall maintain a record of all sports gaming licenses issued under this chapter. (2) The commission shall conduct a complete investigation of each applicant for a sports gaming license to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter and of the commission's rules each time the applicant applies for an initial or renewed sports gaming license. The commission may initiate an additional licensing investigation or adjudication or reopen an existing licensing investigation or adjudication at any time. (G)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (G)(2) and (3) of this section, the commission shall levy and collect all fees and surcharges imposed under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all moneys collected in the casino control commission fund created under section 5753.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Of the license fees described in division (E) of section 3775.04, division (B)(3) of section 3775.05, and division (B)(3) of section 3775.051 of the Revised Code, the commission shall deposit one half one-half of one per cent in the sports gaming profits veterans fund created under section 5902.22 of the Revised Code and shall deposit the remainder in the sports gaming revenue fund created under section 5753.031 of the Revised Code. (3) The commission shall levy and collect fines for noncriminal violations of the provisions of this chapter and of rules adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all such fines in the sports gaming revenue fund created under section 5753.031 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) The commission, in an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and in accordance with section 3772.04 of the Revised Code, may do any of the following: (a) Penalize or fine any sports gaming licensee, applicant for a sports gaming license, or other person who is subject to the commission's jurisdiction under this chapter; (b) Limit, condition, restrict, suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew any sports gaming license. (2) The executive director of the commission may issue an emergency order with respect to sports gaming under division (G) of section 3772.04 of the Revised Code. (I)(1) The commission shall monitor all sports gaming conducted in this state by sports gaming proprietors, or shall contract with an independent integrity monitoring provider for that purpose, in order to identify any unusual betting activities or patterns that may indicate a need for further investigation. The commission shall require each sports gaming proprietor to participate in the monitoring system as part of the minimum internal control standards described in division (D) of this section. (2) The information in the monitoring system described in division (I)(1) of this section is not a public record. The commission may disclose the information in the monitoring system only as necessary for investigative or law enforcement purposes or pursuant to a court order. (J)(1) The executive director of the commission promptly shall report to the commission any facts or circumstances related to the operation of a sports gaming licensee that constitute a violation of state or federal law and immediately report any suspicious wagering to the appropriate state or federal authorities. (2) The commission shall cooperate with any investigation conducted by a law enforcement agency or sports governing body, including by providing, or facilitating the provision of, wagering information and audio or video files related to persons placing wagers, provided that the commission shall not be required to provide any information to a sports governing body that would jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation. (3) A sheriff, chief of police, or prosecuting attorney shall furnish to the commission, on forms prescribed by the commission, any information obtained concerning any apparent violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. If the information is considered a confidential law enforcement investigatory record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, the commission shall not disclose the information to the public. (K)(1) The attorney general has a civil cause of action to restrain any violation of this chapter or of rules adopted under this chapter. Upon the request of the commission or its executive director, the attorney general shall commence and prosecute such an action to completion. The court shall give priority to such an action over all other civil actions. (2) An action brought under division (K)(1) of this section does not preclude an administrative or criminal proceeding on the same facts. (3) The attorney general may enter into an agreement with a state or local law enforcement agency to carry out the duties described in division (K)(1) of this section. Sec. 3775.10. (A) A sports gaming proprietor shall do all of the following: (1) Conduct all sports gaming activities and functions in a manner that does not pose a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state; (2) Adopt comprehensive house rules for game play governing sports gaming transactions with its patrons, including rules that specify the amounts to be paid on winning wagers and the effect of schedule changes, and submit them to the Ohio casino control commission for approval before implementing them. The sports gaming proprietor shall publish its house rules as part of its minimum internal control standards, shall display the house rules, together with any other information the commission considers appropriate, conspicuously in each sports gaming facility and in any other place or manner prescribed by the commission, and shall make copies of its house rules readily available to patrons. (3) Keep current in all payments and obligations to the commission; (4) Provide a secure location for the placement, operation, and use of sports gaming equipment; (5) Prevent any person from tampering with or interfering with the operation of sports gaming; (6) Employ commercially reasonable methods to prevent the sports gaming proprietor and its agents and employees from disclosing any confidential information in the possession of the sports gaming proprietor that could affect the conduct of sports gaming; (7) Ensure that sports gaming conducted at a sports gaming facility is within the sight and control of designated employees of the sports gaming proprietor and that sports gaming is conducted under continuous observation by security equipment in conformity with the specifications and requirements of the commission; (8) Ensure that sports gaming occurs only in the locations and manner approved by the commission and that the sports gaming proprietor conducts only authorized sports gaming; (9) Ensure that all sports gaming is monitored in accordance with division (I) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code; (10) Maintain sufficient funds and other supplies to conduct sports gaming at all times; (11) Maintain daily records showing the sports gaming proprietor's sports gaming receipts and timely file with the commission any additional reports required by rule or by other provisions of the Revised Code; (12) Withhold all required amounts from patrons' sports gaming winnings; (13) Submit to the commission, each fiscal year, an audit of the sports gaming proprietor's financial transactions and the condition of the sports gaming proprietor's total operations prepared by a certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and applicable state and federal laws; (14) Submit to the commission, at least once every three years, an audit of the sports gaming proprietor's information technology systems and security protocols prepared by a qualified, independent, and capable third party, as determined by, and in a manner approved by, the commission; (15) Promptly provide anonymized sports gaming data to a sports governing body or a state university that submits a valid request for the data under division (B)(13) or (14) (B)(12) or (13) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code. (B) A sports gaming proprietor immediately shall report to the commission any information in the sports gaming proprietor's possession related to any of the following: (1) Any wager in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter or of federal law; (2) Abnormal sports gaming activity or patterns that may indicate a concern regarding the integrity of a sporting event; (3) Suspicious wagering activities; (4) Any conduct that corrupts a wagering outcome of a sporting event for purposes of financial gain; (5) Any criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced against the sports gaming proprietor by any person other than the commission in connection with the sports gaming proprietor's operations. (C) A sports gaming proprietor may manage risk associated with wagers by rejecting or pooling one or more wagers or by laying off one or more wagers with another sports gaming proprietor. (D) A sports gaming proprietor may employ a system that offsets loss or manages risk in the operation of sports gaming under this chapter through the use of a liquidity pool in another jurisdiction in which the sports gaming proprietor or an affiliate or other third party also holds licensure, provided that at all times adequate protections are maintained to ensure sufficient funds are available to pay patrons. (E) A sports gaming proprietor may provide promotional gaming credits to patrons, subject to oversight by the commission. (F) If a sports gaming patron does not claim a winning wager from a sports gaming proprietor within one year from the last day on which the sporting event is held, the sports gaming proprietor's obligation to pay the winnings shall expire, and the sports gaming proprietor shall remit the winnings to the commission, which shall deposit them in the sports gaming revenue fund. (G) A sports gaming proprietor is not liable under the laws of this state to any party, including a patron, for disclosing information as required under this chapter or for refusing to disclose information that is not required by law to be disclosed. (H)(1) A sports gaming proprietor shall maintain the confidentiality of any information provided to the sports gaming proprietor by a sports governing body that the sports governing body designates as confidential, except as otherwise required by law or by order of the commission. The sports gaming proprietor shall not use such confidential information for business or marketing purposes, except with the express written approval of the sports governing body. (2) A sports governing body shall maintain the confidentiality of any information provided to the sports governing body by a sports gaming proprietor that the sports gaming proprietor designates as confidential, except as otherwise required by law or by order of the commission. The sports governing body shall not use such confidential information for business or marketing purposes, except with the express written approval of the sports gaming proprietor. Sec. 3775.99. (A) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first offense and a felony of the fifth degree on a subsequent offense: (1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted under this chapter; (2) Permits an individual under twenty-one years of age to engage in sports gaming; (3) Aids, induces, or causes an individual under twenty-one years of age who is not an employee of the sports gaming proprietor to enter or attempt to enter a sports gaming facility; (4) Enters or attempts to enter a sports gaming facility while under twenty-one years of age, except as permitted under division (C) of section 3775.12 of the Revised Code; (5) Participates in sports gaming in violation of division (D) of section 3775.13 of the Revised Code, other than as part of operating sports gaming or as part of the employee's employment. (B) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent offense. If the person is a sports gaming licensee under this chapter, the Ohio casino control commission shall revoke the person's license issued under this chapter after the first offense. (1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value to anyone for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a sporting event or attempts to do so; (2) Places, increases, or decreases a wager after acquiring knowledge not available to the general public that anyone has been offered, promised, or given anything of value for the purpose of influencing the outcome of the sporting event upon which the wager is placed, increased, or decreased, or attempts to do so; (3) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any device that is intended by that person to be used to violate any provision of this chapter or the sports gaming laws of any other state; (4) Places a bet or aids any other person in placing a bet on a sporting event after unlawfully acquiring knowledge of the outcome on which winnings from that bet are contingent; (5) Claims, collects, or takes anything of value from a sports gaming proprietor with intent to defraud or attempts to do so without having made a wager in which the amount or value is legitimately won or owed; (6) Places a wager using counterfeit currency or other counterfeit form of credit approved for wagering; (7) Possesses any device intended to be used to violate this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, or any materials used to manufacture such a device. This division does not apply to a sports gaming proprietor or to an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor who is acting in furtherance of the sports gaming proprietor's interest. (8) Changes or alters the normal outcome of any sports gaming conducted through an online sports pool, including any system used to monitor the online sports pool, or the way in which the outcome is reported to any patron; (9) Operates sports gaming that is not authorized sports gaming; (10) Otherwise operates sports gaming in a manner other than the manner required under this chapter. Premises or any internet web site used or occupied in violation of this division constitute a nuisance subject to abatement under Chapter 3767. of the Revised Code. (C) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a felony of the third degree. If the person is a sports gaming licensee under this chapter, the commission shall revoke the person's license issued under this chapter after the first offense. If the person is a public servant or political party official, the person is forever disqualified from holding any public office, employment, or position of trust in this state. (1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or benefit to a person who is connected with a sports gaming proprietor, an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor, or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission, under an agreement to influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of the person to whom the offer, promise, or gift is made in order to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of sports gaming or an official action of a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission; (2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything of value or benefit while the person is connected with a sports gaming proprietor, an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor, or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission, under an agreement to influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of the person to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of sports gaming or an official action of a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission. (D) Whoever knowingly does any of the following while participating in sports gaming or otherwise transacting with a sports gaming proprietor as permitted under this chapter or sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent offense: (1) Causes or attempts to cause the person to fail to file a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act" or section 123 of Pub. L. No. 91-508; (2) Causes or attempts to cause the person to file a report under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, to file a report or to maintain a record required by any order issued under 31 U.S.C. 3126, or to maintain a record required under any regulation prescribed under section 21 of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act" or section 123 of Pub. L. No. 91-508 that contains a material omission or misstatement of fact; (3) With one or more sports gaming proprietors, structures a transaction, is complicit in structuring a transaction, attempts to structure a transaction, or is complicit in an attempt to structure a transaction. As used in this division: (a) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of the Revised Code. (b) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 3770.23, 3770.25, 3775.01, 3775.02, 3775.10, and 3775.99 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.